New York, session 2025-2026, A10106.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (f) of subdivision 2 of section 41 of the naviga- 2 tion law is amended to read as follows: 3 (f) When a mechanically propelled vessel shall meet a sailing vessel, 4 swimmer, kayak, canoe, row boat, paddleboard, crew racing shell or other 5 nonmotorized boat or floatation device proceeding in such direction as 6 to involve risk of collision, the sailing vessel, swimmer, kayak, canoe, 7 row boat, paddleboard, crew racing shell or other nonmotorized boat or 8 floatation device shall have the right of way. The operator of the 9 mechanically propelled vessel must maintain a vigilant lookout to see 10 the water in front and on the sides of the vessel. It shall be incumbent 11 on the master of [the] a sailing vessel to keep a vigilant lookout and 12 change [her] the course of such vessel, if necessary, to avoid any 13 danger. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14646-01-6